District of Columbia statutes.
48-1004

Repealed

Prohibition.

Repealed.

June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-270, § 5, 43 DCR 4493
May 6, 2015, D.C. Law 20-274, § 3, 61 DCR 12117
This section is referenced in § 48-1005.
1981 Ed., § 33-584.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 48-1001.